Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-184
Mark, defined.

A mark means a physical identification that includes, but is not limited to, visible characteristics on an animal such as a natural, accidental, or manmade blemish that sets apart a particular animal from all others. Such marks include, but are not limited to, hair coloration, scars, brands, earmarks, or tattoos.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 15.